Rhode Island statutes. Title 11 Criminal Offenses
Chapter 43 Treason and Related Offenses

11-43-1.
Treason.

Every person who shall be convicted of treason against this state by levying war against the state or by adhering to the enemies of this state, giving them aid and comfort, shall be imprisoned during life.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 275, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 341, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 392, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 603, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

11-43-1

.

11-43-2.
Proof required for treason.

No person shall be convicted of treason against this state by levying war against the state, or by adhering to the enemies of this state, giving them aid and comfort, but by testimony of two (2) lawful witnesses to the same overt act for which he or she shall then be on trial, unless he or she shall confess it in open court.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 275, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 341, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 392, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 603, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

11-43-2

.

11-43-3.
Misprision of treason.

Every person who shall have knowledge of the commission of treason against this state by levying war against this state or by adhering to the enemies of the state, giving them aid and comfort, and who shall conceal it, and shall not as soon as possible, disclose and make known the treason to the governor or to some magistrate, shall be deemed guilty of misprision of treason against this state and shall be imprisoned not exceeding twenty (20) years, nor less than five (5) years, or be fined not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 275, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 341, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 392, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 603, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

11-43-3

.

11-43-4 — 11-43-6.
Repealed.

11-43-7.
Unlawful exercise of functions of state office.

Every person, except as duly elected according to the laws of this state, who shall assume or exercise any of the legislative, executive, or ministerial functions of the office of governor, lieutenant-governor, senator, member of the house of representatives, secretary of state, attorney general, or general treasurer of this state, within the territorial limits of the state, as they are now actually had and enjoyed, either separately or with others, or shall assemble with others, for the purpose of exercising any of those functions, shall be imprisoned during life.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 275, § 6; G.L. 1909, ch. 341, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 392, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 603, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

11-43-7

.

11-43-8.
Venue of indictments or information and prosecutions.

Indictments or informations under this chapter may be preferred and found in the discretion of the attorney general, without reference to the county in which the offense is charged to have been committed, but they shall be tried in the court for the county where found, unless the court shall for good cause remove it into some other county.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 275, § 8; C. P. A. 1905, § 1170; G.L. 1909, ch. 341, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 392, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 603, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

11-43-8

; P.L. 1974, ch. 118, § 8.

11-43-9.
Indorsement of complaints.

No warrant shall issue to apprehend any person for any violation of this chapter, unless the complaint shall be first allowed of and indorsed or countersigned by the governor or by the attorney general.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 275, § 9; G.L. 1909, ch. 341, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 392, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 603, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

11-43-9

.

11-43-10.
Arrest and commitment of persons charged.

Whenever any person shall be adjudged to be probably guilty of any offense under this chapter, he or she may be committed to the adult correctional institutions in any county, there to remain until discharged by order of law, and warrant of commitment shall issue accordingly, directed to the division of sheriffs or to either of the city or town sergeants or town constables in the same county with himself or herself, and to the warden of the adult correctional institutions, which warrant may be executed by the officer charged with it, although beyond his or her precinct, and shall constitute him or her, while charged with it, an officer, the obstructing of whom, while in the execution of this office, shall be punished as is or may be by law in other cases provided.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 275, § 10; G.L. 1909, ch. 341, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 392, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 603, § 10; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

11-43-10

; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 39; P.L. 2015, ch. 260, § 16; P.L. 2015, ch. 275, § 16.

11-43-11 — 11-43-14.
Repealed.